Washington statutes.
RCW 36.125.060

Outer coast marine resources committee program—Annual reports.

(1) The outer coast marine resources committee program is created to provide support for the development, administration, and coordination of outer coast marine resources committees and their projects.

(2) The director of fish and wildlife is the administrator of the outer coast marine resources committee program. As the administrator of the program, the director of fish and wildlife shall:

(a) Provide each outer coast marine resources committee with a coordinator to support the administration and work of the committee; and

(b) Distribute grants to outer coast marine resources committees for projects that benefit Washington's coastal marine resources. The director of fish and wildlife shall develop procedures and criteria for allocating funds for projects, which may include annual allocation of funding to each committee.

(3) Each outer coast marine resources committee shall prepare and deliver an annual report to the director of fish and wildlife by October 31st of each year. The report must include, but is not limited to, a summary of actions taken that year and prioritized recommendations for future action. The director of fish and wildlife shall compile the individual outer coast marine resources committee reports into a consolidated report, and provide the consolidated report to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 31st of each year.

[ 2008 c 242 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2008 c 242: See note following RCW 36.125.020.